Utah statutes.
20A-11-1404.   Establishment and administration of political fund.
(1)  A labor organization wishing to make expenditures for political purposes
shall establish a political fund.
(2)  Each labor organization that establishes a political fund shall:
(a)  maintain the political fund as a separate, segregated account apart from
any account containing monies received by a labor organization as union dues;
(b)  ensure that each contribution to the political fund is voluntary; and
(c)  register the political fund as a political action committee or political
issues committee as required by this chapter.
(3) (a) Except as otherwise provided in this part, a labor organization may
only make expenditures for political purposes from a political fund
established in accordance with this part.
(b)  A labor organization may not expend union dues for political purposes or
transfer union dues to a political fund.
(4)  Nothing in this part precludes a labor organization from making
expenditures of union dues to communicate directly with its own members about
political candidates or political issues.
(5)  Nothing in this part precludes a labor organization from making
expenditures of union dues either for the establishment and administration of
a political fund or to solicit contributions from its members to a political
fund.
(6)  Nothing in this part is intended to, or may be construed to, preempt any
requirement of federal law.
